Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2205
Violation; notice; penalty.

In the event of violation of any franchise provision or the provisions of sections 18-2201 to 18-2205 by any duly franchised person or entity furnishing community antenna television service, the municipality having granted such franchise shall immediately serve notice of such violation upon the franchise holder with directions to correct such violation within ninety days or show cause why such violation should not be corrected at a public hearing held in conjunction with the next regularly scheduled meeting of the franchising body. Continued violation of sections 18-2201 to 18-2205 may be enjoined by the district court. Any person who willfully violates any provision of sections 18-2201 to 18-2205 or of any local franchise ordinance shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars.

Laws 1969, c. 119, § 5, p. 538.